Washington statutes.
RCW 35.70.060

Notice of resolution and order—Service.

The notice shall be served:

(1) By delivering a copy to the owner or reputed owner of each parcel of land affected, or to the authorized agent of the owners, or

(2) By leaving a copy thereof at the usual place of abode of the owner in the city or town with a person of suitable age and discretion residing therein, or

(3) If the owner is a nonresident of the city or town and his or her place of residence is known by mailing a copy to the owner addressed to his or her last known place of residence, or

(4) If the place of residence of the owner is unknown or if the owner of any parcel of land affected is unknown, by publication in the official newspaper of the city or town once a week for two consecutive weeks. The notice shall specify a reasonable time within which the sidewalk shall be constructed which in the case of publication of the notice shall not be less than sixty days from the date of the first publication of such notice.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2121; 1985 c 469 s 36; 1965 c 7 s 35.70.060. Prior: 1915 c 149 s 4; RRS s 9158.]